Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1129.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. A. From the funds appropriated to the Office of
Educational Quality and Accountability in Enrolled House Bill No.
2766 of the 1st Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, the sum of
Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) shall be used to provide
grants to school districts in this state to provide a cellphone-free
educational environment. Grants shall be provided on a first-come,
first-served basis only to school districts whose governing boards
of education have adopted a policy prohibiting students from using
cell phones and personal electronic devices while on the campus of a
public school district from bell to bell for three (3) school years,
beginning with the 2025-2026 school year.

B. Grants awarded pursuant to this section shall be used during
the 2025-2026 school year to purchase devices or equipment in which
students enrolled in a grant recipient school district can store
their cell phones and personal electronic devices during the school
day. In conjunction with the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services, the Office of Educational Quality and Accountability may
negotiate and enter into a contract with a vendor to offer a state
rate price to grant recipient school districts; provided, however, a
grant recipient school district shall not be required to use a
vendor contracted by the Office of Educational Quality and
Accountability.
C. Grant recipient school districts shall electronically submit
a report to the Office of Educational Quality and Accountability
detailing how grant funds were used.
D. The Commission for Educational Quality and Accountability
shall be authorized to promulgate rules in order to effectuate the
provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1129 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 20th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1129 Page 3